Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 2. Second Amendment Protection Act

History.

2022 ch. 99, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 99, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-14-201.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Second Amendment Protection Act.”

History.

2022 ch. 99, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 99, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-14-202.
Declaration of authority.

The Second Amendment Protection Act is enacted under the authority of the second and tenth amendments to the United States Constitution, article 1, section 24 of the Wyoming Constitution, Wyoming’s agreement with the United States that the state adopted when it joined the Union under the United States Constitution’s system of dual sovereignty, and Printz v. United States, 521 U.S. 898 (1997).

The legislature further declares that the authority for W.S.

9-14-201

through

9-14-203

is provided by the findings in W.S.

6-8-406

.

History.

2022 ch. 99, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 99, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2022.

§ 9-14-203.
Prohibiting the enforcement of federal regulation of firearms, firearm accessories, magazines and ammunition; penalties; defense of Wyoming citizens.

This state and all political subdivisions of this state are prohibited from using any personnel or funds appropriated by the legislature of the state of Wyoming or any other source of funds that originated within the state of Wyoming to enforce, administer or cooperate with any unconstitutional act, law, treaty, executive order, rule or regulation of the United States government that infringes on or impedes the free exercise of individual rights guaranteed under the Second Amendment to the Constitution of the United States.

Nothing in this act shall limit or restrict a public officer, as defined in W.S. 6-5-101(a)(v), from providing assistance to federal authorities for purposes not specifically identified in subsection (a) of this section. Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit Wyoming governmental entities from accepting federal funds for law enforcement purposes.

Any public officer, as defined in W.S. 6-5-101(a)(v), who knowingly violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both.

History.

2022 ch. 99, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2022, ch, 99, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2022.